South Dakota, session 2026, HB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 23:
Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Federal firearm measure," any initial or amended version of a federal statute,
regulation, rule, guidance, or order, which takes effect on or after July 1, 2026, is
more restrictive than a law of this state, and pertains to:
(a) A registry of firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition;
(b) A registry of firearm owners;
(c) Required licensing or permitting of a law-abiding individual, as a condition
of owning, possessing, or carrying a firearm, firearm accessory, or
ammunition;
(d) A required criminal background check as a condition of a private sale or
transfer, to another individual, of any firearm, firearm accessory, or
ammunition;
(e) The confiscation of any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition, from a
law-abiding individual; or
(f) The surrender, whether for compensation or not, of any firearm, firearm
accessory, or ammunition, by a law-abiding individual;
(2) "Law-abiding individual," one who is not prohibited from possessing a firearm or
ammunition under the laws of this state; and
(3) "Material aid," an action that has the purpose or effect of assisting in, cooperating
with, or facilitating any investigation, detention, or arrest, at the direction of any
federal authority, in the enforcement of a federal firearm measure, including:
(a) The collection or sharing of identifying information;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.500.9 2 1132
(b) The use of equipment, facilities, or personnel;
(c) The use of moneys from any source; and
(d) Joint task-force participation.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 23:
No official or employee of this state, or of any political subdivision of this state,
may use or authorize the use of personnel, property, or moneys, to provide material aid.
No official or employee of this state, or of any political subdivision of this state,
may enter into any contract, including a memorandum of understanding, which would
require or authorize material aid.
Nothing in this chapter prohibits an official or employee of this state, or of any
political subdivision of this state from:
(1) Cooperating in multi-jurisdictional investigations or pursuits that have a non-
firearms-related criminal nexus;
(2) Participating in joint operations for the purpose of enforcing state law, even if
federal officers are present, provided no material aid is given;
(3) Complying with a lawful order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(4) Taking any action against an individual prohibited under the laws of this state from
possessing a firearm or ammunition; or
(5) Accepting or using federal moneys to enforce a state law.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each discrete act defined as
material aid constitutes a separate offense.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 23:
Any person may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against this
state or any political subdivision of this state, if an official or employee violates section 2
of this Act.
A court may impose a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding fifty thousand
dollars per violation, and may award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to a prevailing
plaintiff.
A court may grant declaratory and injunctive relief.
An employee of this state or of a political subdivision of this state who, in good
faith, reports or refuses to participate in conduct the employee reasonably believes would
violate section 2 of this Act is protected against retaliation and may seek appropriate relief,
including reinstatement, back pay, and attorney's fees.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.500.9 3 1132
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 23:
Any person may file a sworn complaint with the attorney general, alleging a
violation of section 2 of this Act, and provide supporting facts and evidence. If the attorney
general determines that the complaint is merited, the attorney general may bring suit in
the name of this state to enforce section 2 of this Act, including by mandamus or other
equitable relief, and may recover reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.